Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.400

Broadband mapping account—Federal broadband data improvement act funding—Coordination of broadband mapping activities.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1468-S.SL) ***

(1) The broadband mapping account is established in the custody of the state treasurer. The department shall deposit into the account such funds received from legislative appropriation, federal funding, and donated funds from private and public sources. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of RCW 43.330.403 through 43.330.409. Only the director of the department or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) The department is the single eligible entity in the state for purposes of the federal broadband mapping activities.

(3) Federal funding received by the department for broadband mapping activities must be used in accordance with any federal requirements and, subject to those requirements, may be distributed by the department on a competitive basis to other entities in the state.

(4) The department shall consult with the office of financial management and the utilities and transportation commission in coordinating broadband mapping activities. In carrying out any broadband mapping activities, the provisions of P.L. 110-385, Title I, regarding trade secrets, commercial or financial information, and privileged or confidential information submitted by the federal communications commission or a broadband provider are deemed to encompass the consulted agencies.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 603; 2009 c 509 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.105.370.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Findings—Intent—Purpose—2009 c 509: "(1) The legislature finds that the deployment and adoption of high-speed internet services and technology advancements enhance economic development and public safety for the state's communities. Such deployment also offers improved health care, access to consumer and legal services, increased educational and civic participation opportunities, and a better quality of life for the state's residents. The legislature further finds that improvements in the deployment and adoption of high-speed internet services and the strategic inclusion of technology advancements and technology education are critical to ensuring that Washington remains competitive and continues to provide a skilled workforce, attract businesses, and stimulate job growth.

(2) The legislature intends to support strategic partnerships of public, private, nonprofit, and community-based sectors in the continued growth and development of high-speed internet services and information technology. The legislature further intends to ensure that all Washington citizens, businesses, schools, and organizations are able to obtain and utilize broadband fully, regardless of location, economic status, literacy level, age, disability, structure, or size. In addition, the legislature intends that a statewide assessment of the availability, location, service levels, and other characteristics of high-speed internet services and other advanced telecommunications services in the state be conducted.

(3) In recognition of the importance of broadband deployment and adoption to the economy, health, safety, and welfare of the people of Washington, it is the purpose of this act to make high-speed internet service more readily available throughout the state, especially in areas and for populations with a low utilization rate." [ 2009 c 509 s 1.]

Effective date—2009 c 509: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2009." [ 2009 c 509 s 16.]